Hawaii, session 2026, GM1237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the amounts
available to candidates in Hawaii's partial public financing
program were last significantly amended in 1995. The
legislature further finds that since 1995-1996, the value of the
dollar has risen to approximately $2.12.
The purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Increase the expenditure limit and the amount of funds
available to candidates qualified to participate in
the partial public financing program, including
candidates for the board of trustees for the office of
Hawaiian affairs, who run statewide;
(2) Encourage participation in the partial public
financing program by providing for the adjustment of
the amount of minimum qualifying contributions
required for certain offices;
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO
iiiiwiinHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiim

H.B. NO. SS^i
C.D. 1
(3) Increase matching fund payments from $1 to $2 for each
$1 of qualifying contributions in excess of the
minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and
(4) Appropriate funds from the general revenues of the
State to increase the amount of funds available in the
partial public financing program.
SECTION 2. Section 11-423, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-423 Voluntary expenditure limits; filing affidavit.
(a) Any candidate may voluntarily agree to limit the
candidate's expenditures and those of the candidate's candidate
committee or committees and the candidate's party on the
candidate's behalf by filing an affidavit with the campaign
spending commission.
(b) The affidavit shall state that the candidate knows the
voluntary campaign expenditure limitations as set out in this
part and that the candidate is voluntarily agreeing to limit the
candidate's expenditures and those made on the candidate's
behalf by the amount set by law. The affidavit shall be
subscribed to by the candidate and notarized and filed no later
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO

H.B. NO.
hTi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
than the time of filing nomination papers with the chief
election officer or county clerk.
(c) The affidavit shall remain effective until the
termination of the candidate committee or the opening of filing
of nomination papers for the next succeeding election, whichever
occurs first. An affidavit filed under this section [»€ty] shall
not be rescinded.
(d) From January 1 of the year of any primary, special, or
general election, the aggregate expenditures for each election
by a candidate who voluntarily agrees to limit campaign
expenditures, inclusive of all expenditures made or authorized
by the candidate alone, all treasurers, the candidate committee,
and noncandidate committees on the candidate's behalf, shall not
exceed the following amounts expressed, respectively multiplied
by the number of voters in the last preceding general election
registered to vote in each respective voting district:
(1) For the office of governor--[$2.50;] $3.00;
(2) For the office of lieutenant governor—$1.68;
(3) For the office of mayor—[45-t-G^] $2.40;
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO
liWHiiaiiiiiHinBiiiH

Page 4
HI.. B. NO. ""
g .J
C.D. 1
(4) For the offices of state senator, state
representative, county council member, and prosecuting
attorney--[$1.40;] $1.68; and
(5) For all other offices—[S-O] 24 cents.
(e) Notwithstanding subsection (d), a candidate who
voluntarily agrees to limit campaign expenditures may elect to
allocate up to seventy-five per cent of the candidate's combined
aggregate expenditure limit applicable to the primary and
general elections to either election; provided that the
candidate shall not exceed the combined aggregate expenditure
limit applicable to both elections."
SECTION 3. Section 11-425, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§11-425 Maximum amount of public funds available to
candidate. (a) The maximum amount of public funds available in
each election to a candidate for [tho office of governor,
lieutenant gove-rn-or-;—o-r—mayor- shall not oxcood ton per cent of
the c^^ponditurc limit established -in- section 11—4-23-(-d)—f-o-r-oach
clcction-r
-- Tho maximum--amount of publ-i-e -f-u^^ido available in-each
election to a candidate for the office of state senator,—state
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO

Page 5
H.B. NO.
hTi
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
rcpreaentQtivG,—county council "mGmbcr,—and- prosecuting attorney
shall not exceed fifteen pe-r Gent--of the cxpend-itu-rc-limit
oatabliohcd in section 11—423 (d)—f-or-oach election.
-(-e-) tteweiieft—af^eii^ST—the maximum amount
of public- funds--a-valiable to a—eandi-date- shall---not- e-xecod ■■$1,500
in any election year.
-(4)--Fog—all-other offices,—the maximum amount of public
funds avail-abi-e- to a candidate shall not exceed $100 in any
election year.]j_
(1) The office of governor, lieutenant governor, or mayor
of the city and county of Honolulu or the county of
Hawaii shall not exceed 12.5 per cent of the
expenditure limit established in section 11-423(d) for
each election;
(2) The office of state senator, state representative,
mayor of the county of Kauai or the county of Maui,
county council member, and prosecuting attorney shall
not exceed 18.75 per cent of the expenditure limit
established in section 11-423(d) for each election; or
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO 5

Page 6
H.B. NO. SS?,
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(3) The office of Hawaiian affairs shall not exceed 7.5
per cent of the expenditure limit established in
section 11-423(d) for each election.
[-(-el-] (b) Each candidate who qualified for the maximum
amount of public funding in any primary election and who is a
candidate for a subsequent general election shall apply with the
commission to be qualified to receive the maximum amount of
public funds as provided in this section for the respective
general election.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of.this section, a
candidate may elect to allocate up to seventy-five per cent of
the total maximum amount of public funds available to the
candidate for the primary and general elections to either
election; provided that the candidate shall not receive public
funds in excess of the combined maximum amount otherwise
available for both elections.
(d) For purposes of this section, "qualified" means
meeting the qualifying campaign contribution requirements of
section 11-429."
SECTION 4. Section 11-429, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows:
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO

Page 7 2050
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
"(a) As a condition of receiving public funds for a
primary or general election, a candidate shall not be unopposed
in any election for which public funds are sought, shall have
filed an affidavit with the commission pursuant to section
11-423 to voluntarily limit the candidate's campaign
expenditures, and shall be in receipt of the following sum of
qualifying contributions from individual residents of Hawaii:
(1) For the office of governor--qualifying contributions
that in the aggregate exceed $100,000;
(2) For the office of lieutenant governor--qualifying
contributions that in the aggregate exceed $50,000;
(3) For the office of mayor for each respective county:
(A) [C-oufbty] City and county of Honolulu—qualifying
contributions that in the aggregate exceed
$50,000;
(B) County of Hawaii—qualifying contributions that
in the aggregate exceed $15,000;
(C) County of Maui--qualifying contributions that in
the aggregate exceed $10,000; and
(D) County of Kauai—qualifying contributions that in
the aggregate exceed $5,000;
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO
■HinniiiHiiiiiMniii

Page 8
H.B. NO.
hki
C.D. 1
(4) For the office of prosecuting attorney for each
respective county:
(A) [Geuftty] City and county of Honolulu--qualifying
contributions that in the aggregate exceed
[$30/000;3 $25,000;
(B) County of Hawaii—qualifying contributions that
in the aggregate exceed [$10,000;] $5,000; and
(C) County of Kauai--qualifying contributions that in
the aggregate exceed [-$-57-&G0-^3 $3,000;
(5) For the office of county council--for each respective
county:
(A) [County3 City and county of Honolulu—qualifying
contributions that in the aggregate exceed
$5,000;
(B) County of Hawaii—qualifying contributions that
in the aggregate exceed $1,500;
(C) County of Maui—qualifying contributions that in
the aggregate exceed [$5,000;3 $4,000; and
(D) County of Kauai—qualifying contributions that in
the aggregate exceed $3,000;
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO
wniiiiiiiHiiiniii

Page 9
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) For the office of state senator—qualifying
contributions that[—] in the aggregate exceed $2,500;
(7) For the office of state representative—qualifying
contributions that[—] in the aggregate[—] exceed
$1,500;
(8) For the office of Hawaiian affairs--qualifying
contributions that[—] in the aggregate[—] exceed
[■$17-5Q9-;-] $5,500; and
(9) For all other offices[—] "qualifying contributions
that[—] in the aggregate[—] exceed $500[—] for one
.11 office.
(b) A candidate shall obtain the minimum qualifying
contribution amount set forth in subsection (a) once for the
election period.
[4-1-)-] If the candidate obtains the minimum qualifying
contribution amount, the candidate [ie] shall be eligible to
receive;
[4A4-] (1) The minimum payment in an amount equal to the
minimum qualifying contribution amounts; and
2026-3324 HB2050 GDI HMSO

■■■■INnilllllHIINIIIII

Page 10 2050
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(2) Payments of [-H-] $2 for each $1 of qualifying
contributions in excess of the minimum qualifying
contribution amounts [-;—
[43^] A candidate shall have at least one other qualified
candidate as an opponent for the primary or general election to
receive public funds for that election."
SECTION 5. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $2,267,021.06 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be
deposited into the Hawaii election campaign fund.
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the campaign
spending commission for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 6. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect on November 4, 2026;
provided that section 5 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3324 HB2050 CDl HMSO 10
liiiiiniiiiiiiinittiiMiH

2050
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 24th day of June ,2026
GOVE^OR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2050, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2050, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
159-26